Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-111
Director; real estate; power to convey; execution of conveyance.

The director may convey any real estate title which is vested in the department by operation of law or otherwise. Such conveyance shall be signed by the director, sealed with the seal of the department, and acknowledged by the director.

Laws 1925, c. 30, § 7, p. 127;

Laws 1929, c. 38, § 20, p. 167;

C.S.1929, § 8-112;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 10, p. 140;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-112;

R.S.1943, § 8-109;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 11, p. 138;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 12.